Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska59-1714.01
License, defined.

License shall mean the right or permission to use (1) material or personal property, including computer programs, protected under the copyright or patent laws of the United States or any foreign government and (2) a trademark, service mark, or trade name registered under Nebraska law or the law of any other state, of the United States, or of any foreign government.

Laws 1993, LB 218, § 7.